New Jersey, session 221, A2588.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer, upon approval of an application to the authority and the director, shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) in an amount equal to 30 percent of the taxpayers capital investment in a qualified production facility made during a privilege period commencing on or after July 1, 2020 but before July 1, 2028. b.    No tax credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section for any costs or expenses included in the calculation of any other tax credit or exemption granted pursuant to a claim made on a tax return filed with the director, or included in the calculation of an award of business assistance or incentive, for a period of time that coincides with the privilege period for which a tax credit authorized pursuant to this section is allowed. c.     The order of priority in which the tax credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other tax credits allowed by law may be taken shall be as prescribed by the director. The amount of the tax credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), for a privilege period, when taken together with any other payments, credits, deductions, and adjustments allowed by law shall not reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). The amount of the tax credit otherwise allowable under this section which cannot be applied for the privilege period due to the limitations of this subsection or under other provisions of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.) may be carried forward, if necessary, to the seven privilege periods following the privilege period for which the tax credit was allowed. d.    A taxpayer, with an application for a tax credit provided for in this section, may apply to the authority and the director for a tax credit transfer certificate in lieu of the taxpayer being allowed any amount of the tax credit against the tax liability of the taxpayer. The tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the taxpayer from the authority and the director, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, to any other taxpayer that may have a tax liability under the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), or the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in exchange for private financial assistance to be provided by the purchaser or assignee to the taxpayer that has applied for and been granted the tax credit. The tax credit transfer certificate provided to the taxpayer shall include a statement waiving the taxpayer's right to claim that amount of the tax credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) that the taxpayer has elected to sell or assign. The sale or assignment of any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section shall not be exchanged for consideration received by the taxpayer of less than 75 percent of the transferred tax credit amount. Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate used by a purchaser or assignee against a tax liability under P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.) shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of a tax credit pursuant to this section. Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate obtained by a purchaser or assignee under this section may be applied against the purchaser's or assignee's tax liability under N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. and shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of a credit pursuant to section 2 of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). e.     The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved by the director and the authority pursuant to this section and pursuant to section 2 of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed a cumulative total of $100,000,000 in any fiscal year to apply against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) and the tax imposed pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. If the cumulative total amount of tax credits, and tax credit transfer certificates, allowed to taxpayers for privilege periods or taxable years commencing during a single fiscal year under this section and section 2 of P.L.  , c.   (C. )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) exceeds the amount of tax credits available in that fiscal year, then taxpayers who have first applied for and have not been allowed a tax credit or tax credit transfer certificate amount for that reason shall be allowed, in the order in which they have submitted an application, the amount of tax credit or tax credit transfer certificate on the first day of the next succeeding fiscal year in which tax credits and tax credit transfer certificates under this section and section 2 of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) are not in excess of the amount of credits available. f.     A business that is not a taxpayer as defined and used in the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945) P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.) and therefore is not directly allowed a credit under this section, but is a business entity that is classified as a partnership for federal income tax purposes and is ultimately owned by a business entity that is a corporation as defined in subsection (c) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4), or a limited liability company formed under the Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, P.L.2012, c.50 (C.42:2C-1 et seq.), or qualified to do business in this State as a foreign limited liability company, with one member, and is wholly owned by the business entity that is a corporation as defined in subsection (c) of section 4 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-4), but otherwise meets all other requirements of this section, shall be considered an eligible applicant and taxpayer as that term is used in this section. g.    As used in this section: Authority means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority; Capital investment means expenses of at least $30,000,000 incurred for acquisition and development of real estate, materials, and start-up; Qualified production facility means a film production facility within the State of no less than 50,000 square feet of real property and which contains at least one sound stage. 2.    a.  A taxpayer, upon approval of an application to the authority and the director, shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due for the taxable year under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to 30 percent of the taxpayers capital investment in a qualified production facility made during a taxable year commencing on or after July 1, 2020 but before July 1, 2028. b.    No tax credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section for any costs or expenses included in the calculation of any other tax credit or exemption granted pursuant to a claim made on a tax return filed with the director, or included in the calculation of an award of business assistance or incentive, for a period of time that coincides with the taxable year for which a tax credit authorized pursuant to this section is allowed. c.     The order of priority in which the tax credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other tax credits allowed by law may be taken shall be as prescribed by the director. The amount of the tax credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year, when taken together with any other payments, credits, deductions, and adjustments allowed by law shall not reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to an amount less than zero. The amount of the tax credit otherwise allowable under this section which cannot be applied for the taxable year due to the limitations of this section or other provisions of N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. may be carried forward, if necessary, to the seven taxable years following the taxable year for which the tax credit was allowed. d.    (1) A business entity that is classified as a partnership for federal income tax purposes shall not be allowed a tax credit pursuant to this section directly, but the amount of tax credit of a taxpayer in respect of a distributive share of entity income, shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the tax credit acquired by the entity that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total distributive income or gain of the entity for its taxable year ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year. (2)   A New Jersey S Corporation shall not be allowed a tax credit pursuant to this section directly, but the amount of tax credit of a taxpayer in respect of a pro rata share of S Corporation income, shall be determined by allocating to the taxpayer that proportion of the tax credit acquired by the New Jersey S Corporation that is equal to the taxpayer's share, whether or not distributed, of the total pro rata share of S Corporation income of the New Jersey S Corporation for its privilege period ending within or with the taxpayer's taxable year. (3) A business entity that is not a gross income "taxpayer" as defined and used in the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., and therefore is not directly allowed a credit under this section, but otherwise meets all the other requirements of this section, shall be considered an eligible applicant and "taxpayer" as that term is used in this section, and the application of an otherwise allowed credit amount shall be distributed to appropriate gross income taxpayers pursuant to the other requirements of this subsection. e.     A taxpayer, with an application for a tax credit provided for in this section, may apply to the authority and the director for a tax credit transfer certificate in lieu of the taxpayer being allowed any amount of the tax credit against the tax liability of the taxpayer. The tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the taxpayer from the authority and the director, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, to any other taxpayer that may have a tax liability under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., or the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), in exchange for private financial assistance to be provided by the purchaser or assignee to the taxpayer that has applied for and been granted the tax credit. The tax credit transfer certificate provided to the taxpayer shall include a statement waiving the taxpayer's right to claim that amount of the tax credit against the tax imposed pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. that the taxpayer has elected to sell or assign. The sale or assignment of any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section shall not be exchanged for consideration received by the taxpayer of less than 75 percent of the transferred tax credit amount. Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate used by a purchaser or assignee against a tax liability under N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of a tax credit pursuant to this section. Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate obtained by a purchaser or assignee under this section may be applied against the purchaser's or assignee's tax liability under P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.) and shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of a credit pursuant to section 1 of P.L. , c.   (C.     )(pending before the Legislature as this bill). f.     The value of tax credits, including tax credits allowed through the granting of tax credit transfer certificates, approved by the director and the authority pursuant to this section and pursuant to section 1 of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not exceed a cumulative total of $100,000,000 in any fiscal year to apply against the tax imposed pursuant to the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., and the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). If the cumulative total amount of tax credits, and tax credit transfer certificates, allowed to taxpayers for privilege periods or taxable years commencing during a single fiscal year under this section and section 1 of P.L.  , c.   (C. )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) exceeds the amount of tax credits available in that fiscal year, then taxpayers who have first applied for and have not been allowed a tax credit or tax credit transfer certificate amount for that reason shall be allowed, in the order in which they have submitted an application, the amount of tax credit or tax credit transfer certificate on the first day of the next succeeding fiscal year in which tax credits and tax credit transfer certificates under this section and section 1 of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) are not in excess of the amount of credits available. g.    As used in this section: Authority means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority; Capital investment means expenses of at least $30,000,000 incurred for acquisition and development of real estate, materials, and start-up; Qualified production facility means a film production facility within the State of no less than 50,000 square feet of real property and which contains at least one sound stage. 3.    Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the New Jersey Economic Development Authority and the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury may adopt immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law such rules and regulations as the authority or the director shall determine to be necessary to effectuate the purposes of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), which rules and regulations shall be effective for a period not exceeding 360 days following the effective date of P.L.  , c.   (C.   )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) and may thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the authority or the director in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.